Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202538-2130
Certified professional counselor, social worker, certified art therapist; reciprocity; certified marriage and family therapist; licensed in another jurisdiction; military spouse; temporary certificate.

(1) The department, with the recommendation of the board, may issue a certificate based on licensure in another jurisdiction to represent oneself as a certified professional counselor, a social worker, or a certified art therapist to an individual who meets the requirements of the Mental Health Practice Act relating to professional counseling, social work, or art therapy, as appropriate, or substantially equivalent requirements as determined by the department, with the recommendation of the board.

(2) The department, with the recommendation of the board, shall issue a certificate to a marriage and family therapist based on licensure in another jurisdiction to an individual who:

(a) Has a valid, independent, and unrestricted license as a marriage and family therapist in another state or territory that is in good standing with such state or territory;

(b) Completes an application and pays all applicable fees; and

(c) Has passed the Nebraska jurisprudence examination.

(3) An applicant for a certificate who is a military spouse may apply for a temporary certificate as provided in section 38-129.01.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 747;

Laws 2017, LB88, § 66;

Laws 2024, LB605, § 15;

Laws 2025, LB257, § 2.